Washington statutes.
RCW 10.122.070

Exception for interrogation conducted by other jurisdiction.

If a custodial interrogation occurs in another state in compliance with that state's law or is conducted by a federal law enforcement agency in compliance with federal law, the interrogation need not be recorded electronically unless the interrogation is conducted with intent to avoid the requirement of electronic recording in RCW 10.122.030.

[ 2021 c 329 s 7.]